Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-358.07
Clerk of the district court; nonperformance of duties; removal from office.

Any clerk of the district court who fails to perform his or her duties under sections 42-358 to 42-358.07 or the Income Withholding for Child Support Act shall be removed from office after conviction for such offense.

Laws 1975, LB 212, § 9;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 14.

Income Withholding for Child Support Act, see section 43-1701.